Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1865.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 902(a) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 902. (a) Imposition of Tax.--Every insurance company, as herein defined, transacting business in the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, shall pay to the department, a tax at the rate of [two] eight per cent of the gross premiums received from business done within this Commonwealth during each calendar year.12345678910111213141516171819202122 * * *Section 2. The amendment of section 902(a) of the act shall apply to calendar years beginning after December 31, 2025.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1865PN2314 - 2 - 1234